Utah statutes.
53-6-105.   Duties of director -- Powers -- Rulemaking.
(1)  The director, with the advice of the council, shall:
(a)  prescribe standards for the certification of a peace officer training
academy, certify an academy that meets the prescribed standards, and prescribe
standards for revocation of certification for cause;
(b)  prescribe minimum qualifications for certification of peace officers
appointed or elected to enforce the laws of this state and its subdivisions
and prescribe standards for revocation of certification for cause;
(c)  establish minimum requirements for the certification of training
instructors and establish standards for revocation of certification;
(d)  provide for the issuance of appropriate certificates to those peace
officers completing the basic training programs offered by a certified academy
or those persons who pass a certification examination as provided for in this
chapter;
(e)  consult and cooperate with certified academy administrators and
instructors for the continued development and improvement of the basic
training programs provided by the certified academy and for the further
development and implementation of advanced in-service training programs;
(f)  consult and cooperate with state institutions of higher education to
develop specialized courses of study for peace officers in the areas of
criminal justice, police administration, criminology, social sciences, and
other related disciplines;
(g)  consult and cooperate with other departments, agencies, and local
governments concerned with peace officer training;
(h)  perform any other acts necessary to develop peace officer training
programs within the state;
(i)  report to the council at regular meetings of the council and when the
council requires;
(j)  recommend peace officer standards and training requirements to the
commissioner, governor, and the Legislature; and
(k) in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the director shall, with the advice of the council, make rules necessary
to administer this chapter.
(2)  With the permission of the commissioner, the director may execute
contracts on behalf of the division with criminal justice agencies to provide
training for employees of those agencies if:
(a)  the employees or the employing agency pay a registration fee equivalent
to the cost of the training; and
(b)  the contract does not reduce the effectiveness of the division in its
primary responsibility of providing training for peace officers of the state.
(3)  The director may:
(a)  revoke certification of a certified academy for cause; and
(b)  make training aids and materials available to local law enforcement
agencies.
(4)  The director shall, with the advice of the council, make rules:
(a)  establishing minimum requirements for the certification of dispatcher
training instructors in a certified academy or interagency program and
standards for revocation of this certification;
(b)  establishing approved curriculum and a basic schedule for the basic
dispatcher training course and the content of the dispatcher certification
examination;
(c)  providing for the issuance of appropriate certificates to a person who
completes the basic dispatcher course or who passes a dispatcher certification
examination as provided for in this chapter;
(d)  establishing approved courses for certified dispatchers' annual training;
and
(e)  establishing a reinstatement procedure for a certified dispatcher who has
not obtained the required annual training hours.
